Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 2 Labor and Statistics

§§ 27-2-101 through 27-2-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1917, ch. 113, §§ 1 through 3, related to the commissioner of labor and statistics.

§ 27-2-104.
Duties of department of workforce services.

The department of workforce services shall:

Enforce all laws enacted by the legislature of Wyoming, relating to labor, wages, hours of labor, and to the health, welfare, life and limb of the workers of this state;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

Make necessary inspections of industrial establishments and buildings as provided by law;

Make an inspection of all living accommodations provided for employees wherever employed, where the living accommodations are furnished as a part of the wages; and

To promulgate reasonable rules.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 4; 1919, ch. 31, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 264; R.S. 1931, § 109-1204; C.S. 1945, § 54-304; W.S. 1957, § 27-13; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; ch. 71, § 1; 1999, ch. 43, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the introductory language of (a).

Scope of commissioner's power. —

The grant of power to the commissioner does not include jurisdiction to decide what wages are lawfully due in a disputed matter and override a contract of employment. McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981) (decided prior to 1990 amendments).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment, 96 ALR3d 195.

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment, 51 ALR5th 1.

§ 27-2-105.
Report to governor; statistics and information required.

The department of workforce services shall collect, classify, have printed and submit to the governor in its annual report the following statistics:

The hours of labor and number of sex engaged in manual labor;

The aggregate and average daily wages classified by sex and occupation;

The number and character of accidents;

The working conditions of all industrial establishments (including manufacturing establishments, hotels, stores, workshops, theaters, halls and other places where labor is employed);

Other information relating to industrial, economic, social, educational, moral and sanitary conditions of the workers; and

The results of its inspection of industrial establishments.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 265; R.S. 1931, § 109-1205; C.S. 1945, § 54-305; W.S. 1957, § 27-14; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty of state board of health to investigate and report on health of workers and working conditions, see §§

35-1-501

through

35-1-503

.

The 2006 amendment,

added “and” at the end of (a)(v); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the introductory language of (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§§ 27-2-106 and 27-2-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 221, §§ 1 and 2, related to the posting of bond by a nonresident employer.

§ 27-2-108.
Right of entry.

The director of the department of workforce services may designate employees of the department who shall have power to enter any manufacturing establishment, mill, workshop, office, bakery, laundry, store, hotel, theater, hall, or any public or private works where labor is employed, rooms are rented to the public, or machinery is used, for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 269; R.S. 1931, § 109-1209; C.S. 1945, § 54-310; W.S. 1957, § 27-17; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

“This act,” referred to in this section, means Laws 1917, ch. 113, §§ 1 through 17, which appear as §§

27-1-101

through

27-1-104

,

27-1-108

,

27-1-109

,

27-2-104

,

27-2-105

,

27-2-108

and

27-2-109

.

§ 27-2-109.
Examination of witnesses.

The director of the department of workforce services may designate employees of the department who shall have the power to administer oaths, to examine witnesses under oath, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the giving of testimony in any part of this state.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3; ch. 71, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided by law, final agency decisions of the department of workforce services with regard to chapters 4, 5, 6, 7, 8 and 9 of title 27, shall be issued only after an opportunity for hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Any party aggrieved by a final agency decision of the department of workforce services with regards to chapters 4, 5, 6, 7, 8 and 9 of title 27, shall have the right to appeal to district court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 270; R.S. 1931, § 109-1210; C.S. 1945, § 54-311; W.S. 1957, § 27-18; Laws 1961, ch. 202, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3; ch. 71, § 1, 2; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a) and (g).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (g), substituted “department of workforce services” for “department of employment.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 27-2-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 14, related to the salary of the commissioner of labor and statistics, and the deputy commissioner.

§ 27-2-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4.

This section, which derived from Laws 1933, Sp. Sess. ch. 24, § 1, designated the director of the department as its agent to implement the federal employment acts.

§ 27-2-112.
Sale of office publications; exception.

The department of workforce services may sell any publication or other duplicated or printed material, other than the biennial report, which it prepares and which the public may desire to purchase.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-21.1; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the reference to a biennial report, see §

27-2-105

. The department of employment is not required to file a biennial report, only an annual report.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-2-113.
Sale of office publications; limitation on charges.

The charges made by the department of workforce services shall not exceed the cost of materials, printing, duplication, packaging and postage.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 34, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-21.2; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-2-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 34, § 3, related to the disposition of funds from the sale of office publications.